Arkansas, session 2025, HB1572.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE.
(a) Within sixty (60) days after the effective date that this act is
funded, the Department of Energy and Environment shall engage an outside
consulting firm to conduct a technical feasibility study on implementing
nuclear energy generation in this state.
(b) The consulting firm hired under subsection (a) of this section
shall be selected based on the extent to which the consulting firm meets the
following criteria:
(1) Be well-established in the nuclear industry;
(2) Have a large majority of United States nuclear operators as
its customers;
(3) Have had nuclear licensing as its primary business for a
substantial length of time;
(4) Be staffed with individuals who have knowledge and expertise
in:
(A) Nuclear reactor design and operation;
*ANS110*
04-02-2025 14:23:16 ANS110

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H3/31/25 H4/2/25 HB1572
(B) Studies of and expertise in the feasibilities of
various nuclear reactor technologies and designs;
(C) Nuclear reactor licensing, regulation, and law; and
(D) Nuclear reactor siting; and
(5) Be neutral with regard to reactor technology and designs.
(c) Preference shall be given to a consulting firm that is managed by
and owned in substantial part by military veterans with nuclear operating
experience from the military veterans' time in military service.
(d) The feasibility study shall determine:
(1) The advantages and disadvantages of nuclear energy
generation in this state, including without limitation the economic and
environmental impact;
(2) Conclusions and recommendations on:
(A) Optimal design specifications based on site
characteristics, possible industrial uses, and reactor technology maturity;
(B) Land and siting criteria, including specific areas
such as data centers, existing energy facilities, military bases, and
industrial activities requiring process heat that are best suited for new
nuclear generation;
(C) Safety criteria required;
(D) Engineering services required;
(E) The feasibility of implementing all commercially
licensable and available nuclear generation technologies, including small
modular nuclear reactors and microreactors;
(F) Criteria for how well the technologies under
subdivision (d)(2)(E) of this section are tested and if there are any cases
of successful research or commercial operation of the technologies; and
(G) Site transportation and electric transmission
capabilities;
(3) Socioeconomic assessment and impact analysis, including without
limitation consideration of the impact on:
(A) Workforce education, training, and development;
(B) The local and state tax base;
(C) Supply chains; and
(D) Permanent and temporary job creation;
(4) The timeline for development, including areas of potential
04-02-2025 14:23:16 ANS110

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H3/31/25 H4/2/25 HB1572
acceleration or efficiencies and leveraging existing facilities within this
state;
(5) Literature review of studies that have assessed the
potential impact of nuclear energy generation in supporting an energy
transition;
(6) Current and future policies that may be needed to support or
accelerate the adoption of nuclear energy generation or may improve its cost-
effectiveness, including a survey of federal programs and other methods that
could financially assist a nuclear project in this state; and
(7) Through an evaluation by a third party, the technical
accuracy and independence of the written report under subsection (f) of this
section.
(e)(1) The consulting firm hired under subsection (a) of this section
shall engage and consult with the Department of Energy and Environment, the
investor-owned electric utilities, and the electric generation and
transmission cooperatives in conducting the feasibility study.
(2) The Department of Energy and Environment, the investor-owned
electric utilities, and the electric generation and transmission cooperatives
shall cooperate in providing information to the consulting firm hired under
subsection (a) of this section that is conducting the feasibility study as
needed, subject to notification to the investor-owned electric utilities, and
the electric generation and transmission cooperatives and reasonable
safeguards under applicable state law, including without limitation § 23-2-
316, to protect confidential information from being disclosed and made
public.
(3) The consulting firm hired under subsection (a) of this
section shall engage and consult with the Department of Energy and the
Environment, the investor-owned electric utilities, the electric generation
and transmission cooperative, and nuclear reactor and generating facility
manufacturers in conducting the feasibility study to establish reasonable
safeguards under state law to protect intellectual property and design
criteria necessary for the study to protect confidential information and
intellectual property from public disclosure.
(f) No later than fifteen (15) months after the effective date of this act,
the department shall deliver a written report on the feasibility study to
the:
04-02-2025 14:23:16 ANS110

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H3/31/25 H4/2/25 HB1572
(1) Governor;
(2) President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
(3) Majority leader of the Senate;
(4) Minority leader of the Senate;
(5) Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(6) Majority leader of the House of Representatives;
(7) Minority leader of the House of Representatives; and
(8) Chairpersons of the Joint Committee on Energy.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is not a continuous
adequate supply of power to Arkansas citizens and businesses; that a
technical feasibility study of new nuclear energy generation could provide
valuable information as to how to maintain a continuous adequate supply of
power to Arkansas citizens and businesses; and that this act is immediately
necessary because maintaining a continuous adequate supply of power to
Arkansas citizens and businesses is vital. Therefore, an emergency is
declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Ladyman








04-02-2025 14:23:16 ANS110